static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағыныңсы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағығасы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағығасы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағығасы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағығасы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағығасы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағынысы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағынысы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағынысы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағынысы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағынысы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағынансы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағынансы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағынансы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағынансы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағынансы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағыласы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағыласы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағыласы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағыласы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағыласы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағымы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағымы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағымы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағымы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағымы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағылыр . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағылыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағылыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағылыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағылыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағысы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағысы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағысы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағысы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағысы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағылай . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағылай . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағылай . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағылай . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағылай . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағыса . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағыса . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағыса . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағыса . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағыса . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағылаймы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағылаймы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағылаймы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағылаймы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағылаймы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағысамы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағысамы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағысамы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағысамы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағысамы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағылайҙыр . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағылайҙыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағылайҙыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағылайҙыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағылайҙыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағысалыр . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағысалыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағысалыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағысалыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағысалыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағылайсы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағылайсы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағылайсы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағылайсы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағылайсы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымдағысасы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңдағысасы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡындағысасы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙҙағысасы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙҙағысасы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымаса . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңаса . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡынаса . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙғаса . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙғаса . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымасамы . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңасамы . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡынасамы . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙғасамы . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙғасамы . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымасалыр . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңасалыр . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡынасалыр . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙғасалыр . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙғасалыр . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡымасасы . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыңасасы . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡынасасы . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡыбыҙғасасы . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ҡығыҙғасасы . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡмы . +Q
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡмылыр . +Q+Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡтыр . +Indf
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡсы . +Clt/сы
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡтыҡы/135 . +Poss
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡҡай/139 . +Dim
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡтай/141 . +Der/дай
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡса/143 . +Der/са
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡтағы/145 . +Der/дағы
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡтағылар/115 . +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡлы/147 . +Der/лы
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡһыҙ/151 . +Abe
SFX 112 ыҡ ыҡҡаса/155 . +Der/ҡаса
